District of Columbia statutes.
50-2302.02

Exceptions.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to the following violations, which shall continue to be prosecuted as criminal offenses:

(1)

Any felony or any misdemeanor for which the provision prohibiting the same is not codified in: (A) Title 50 of the District of Columbia Official Code; (B) Title 14 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations; (C) Title 32 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations; or (D) Highways and Traffic Regulations of the District of Columbia; provided, that upon the Mayor complying with § 2-602, and transmitting to the Council a complete and accurate draft of a District of Columbia Municipal Code, this paragraph shall stand amended upon publication of such Municipal Code to substitute in subparagraphs (B), (C) and (D) of this paragraph, the appropriate titles of such Municipal Code;

(2)

Repealed;

(2A)

Violation of § 50-2201.04(b-1);

(3)

Violation of § 50-2203.01;

(4)

Violation of § 50-2201.05(a);

(5)

Violation of § 50-2201.05(b);

(6)

Violation of § 50-2207.01 [repealed];

(7)

Violation of § 50-1501.04;

(8)

Violation of § 50-1401.01(d);

(9)

Violation of § 50-1403.01(e);

(10)

Violation of Commissioners’ Order No. 57-1086, dated June 11, 1957 (Highway and Traffic Regulations, § 22(d)) (driving at a speed greater than 30 miles per hour in excess of the legal speed limit);

(11)

Violation of § 2.401(1) of Title 32 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations (failure or refusal to surrender an operator’s license which has been suspended, revoked or cancelled);

(12)

Commission of any offense contained in Chapters VII or VIII of Title 32 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations;

(13)

Violation of § 11.701(a) of Title 32 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations (tampering with a locked or secured bicycle);

(14)

Violation of § 2.501 of Title 32 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations (acting as a driving school instructor without a license);

(15)

Violation of § 2.801 of Title 32 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations (operating a school bus without a permit);

(16)

Violation of § 5.201 of Title 32 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations (carrying on or conducting the business of a dealer without a registration);

(17)

Violation of subsection (d) of Commissioners’ Order No. 66-535, dated April 21, 1966 (Highways and Traffic Regulations, § 87(d)) (unauthorized use of emergency parking permits);

(18)

Violation of § 50-1401.01(c);

(19)

Violation of 18 DCMR § 2000.2; and

(20)

Violation of § 50-2303.07(b).

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 202, 25 DCR 1275
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-36, § 4(a), 28 DCR 3383
Nov. 17, 1981, D.C. Law 4-52, § 3(f), 28 DCR 4348
June 8, 2013, D.C. Law 19-316, § 3, 60 DCR 1713
This section is referenced in § 50-921.04, § 50-2301.04, § 50-2302.01, and § 50-2303.01.
1981 Ed., § 40-612.
1973 Ed., § 40-1110.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-316 repealed (2); and added (2A).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Reckless Driving Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-75, May 23, 2013, 60 DCR 7597, 20 DCSTAT 1428).

Title 18 of the DCMR (Vehicles and Traffic) (June, 1987) has replaced Title 32 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations, referred to in (1)(C), and (11) through (16).

Section 8 of D.C. Law 19-316 provided that the act shall apply as of June 1, 2013.